Hawaii, session 2026, HB2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 712, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§712-     Terms of imprisonment; fines; doubled; certain offenders.  (1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a person is convicted of an offense under this part and: (a)  The person's conviction is based on the sale or distribution of a drug or intoxicating compound; and (b)  The sale or distribution occurred within one hundred feet of any school or public park, the person shall be penalized pursuant to subsection (2). (2) The court shall impose: (a)  A fine that is twice the maximum fine; and (b)  A term of imprisonment that is twice the maximum term of imprisonment, that would otherwise be imposed pursuant to this part." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________